Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Part 1

Accounting

18-2-101. Cash book — Penalty for violations.

The clerks of the courts, and clerks and masters, shall keep a cash book as one (1) of the public records of their respective offices, in which they shall enter, under each case, all sums of money received or disbursed by them, showing the date of receipt or disbursement, on what account received or disbursed and to or from whom received or disbursed.

The cash book shall be indexed direct and reverse.

The cash book shall at all times be open to the inspection of the public.

It is a Class A misdemeanor for any clerk or clerk and master to fail to keep the cash book or to allow its inspection as provided in this section.

Acts 1897, ch. 26; Shan., § 5852a1; Code 1932, § 10053; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-201; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Cross-References. Application to references to clerks and masters, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 53.05.

Clerk, clerical and administrative staff of board of commissioners, §§18-6-101 —18-6-103.

Disposition of unclaimed moneys, title 5, ch. 8, part 4.

Money paid into court, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 67.03.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 642.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 13.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

Comparative Legislation. Accounting and bonds:

Ala. Code §§12-2-91,12-2-92,12-17-91.

Ark. Code §§14-14-1303,16-20-106,16-20-201.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §15-6-59.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 21A.030, 30A.030.

Miss. Code Ann. §§9-3-13,9-5-131,9-7-121.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 483.025 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. §§ 7A-11, 7A-20, 7A-107.

Va. Code §§ 17-38.

Collateral References. 15A Am. Jur. 2d Clerks of Courts §§ 24-26.

14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts § 42.

Clerks of Courts
70.

18-2-102. Payment of money to parties — Penalty for violations.

It is the duty of each of the clerks of the several courts, upon application of the party entitled, the party's agent or attorney, made at the office of the clerk, to pay and deliver to the applicant, without delay, any money or property in the clerk's hands, received by virtue of any decree, judgment or order of the court, or any judge of the court, or by virtue of the clerk's office.

A failure to comply with the requirements of this section is a Class C misdemeanor and, moreover, subjects the clerk to motion against the clerk and the clerk's sureties.

Code 1858, §§ 4043, 4044 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 66, §§ 8, 9); Shan., §§ 5860, 5861; Code 1932, §§ 10062, 10063; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-202; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Money paid into court, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 67.03.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 640.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, §§ 12-14; 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Special Project: Criminal Procedure as Defined by the Tennessee Supreme Court (Julian L. Bibb and Walter Sillers Weems), 30 Vand. L. Rev. (4) 691.

Attorney General Opinions. A clerk of a trial court is required to collect all costs incident to litigation, including costs incurred by a successful plaintiff at the initiation of a lawsuit, and to pay such costs to that party as part of the judgment of the court, OAG 02-072 (6/3/02).

Litigation taxes paid by a plaintiff at the filing of a lawsuit may not be included as costs and may not be recovered at the conclusion of a lawsuit against an unsuccessful defendant absent a court order to the contrary, OAG 02-072 (6/3/02).

18-2-103. Report of money or assets held.

It is the duty of the clerks or clerks and masters of the respective courts to prepare a written financial report describing and identifying the amounts of money or other assets in their respective offices at the end of each fiscal year.

The report shall include a listing of all cases for which funds are being held, showing the style of each case and the amount held for each case.

The report shall be filed with the respective court within thirty (30) days of the close of the fiscal year.

The report shall be available for inspection by the comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller of the treasury's designated representative, parties to the litigation and their counsel and other interested parties.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 37, § 9; Shan., § 420; mod. Code 1932, § 669; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-203; Acts 1984, ch. 843, § 1.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 636.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12.

Law Reviews.

Special Project: Criminal Procedure as Defined by the Tennessee Supreme Court (Julian L. Bibb and Walter Sillers Weems), 30 Vand. L. Rev. (4) 691.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

18-2-104. False report of moneys held.

Any clerk or clerk and master who willfully and corruptly makes a false report to the court of the matters required by §18-2-103 commits a Class A misdemeanor, and the clerk shall be removed from office under §18-2-213.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 37, § 10; Shan., § 422; Code 1932, § 670; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-204; Acts 1989, ch 591, § 111.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 617.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 13.

Law Reviews.

Special Project: Criminal Procedure as Defined by the Tennessee Supreme Court (Julian L. Bibb and Walter Sillers Weems), 30 Vand. L. Rev. (4) 691.

Collateral References. 14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts §§ 8, 50.

18-2-105. Unlawful use or disposal of money or property.

Any clerk or clerk and master of any court who, without authority of law, uses, loans or converts to the clerk's or clerk and master's own use, or otherwise disposes of, any money or property that may have come into the clerk's or clerk and master's hands in the clerk's or clerk and master's official capacity, commits a Class C felony.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 37, § 11; Shan., § 423; mod. Code 1932, § 671; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-205; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 26.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C felony, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 13.

Law Reviews.

Special Project: Criminal Procedure as Defined by the Tennessee Supreme Court (Julian L. Bibb and Walter Sillers Weems), 30 Vand. L. Rev. (4) 691.

18-2-106. Reports of property sold.

It is the duty of the clerk, whenever property has been sold by the clerk under order of the clerk's court, or any judge of the court, at each term to make and submit to the court a report showing the property sold, the amount of the sale, the principal and interest collected, the aggregate fund on hand, the disbursements made, to whom and when, specifying separately the fees allowed to the clerk and other officers of court.

Any person interested in the report may except to the report, as in other cases.

Code 1858, §§ 4045, 4046 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 178, §§ 1, 2); Shan., § 5862; Code 1932, § 10064; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-206.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 877.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

18-2-107. Decree on report of property sold — Appeal.

The report and the action of the court on the report shall be embodied in a decree, to be entered on the minutes of the court, and the clerk shall be entitled to no other fees or allowances than those specified and fixed by the decree of the court.

The action of the court is subject to the right of appeal by the persons interested, as in other cases.

Code 1858, §§ 4047, 4048 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 178, § 2); Shan., § 5863; Code 1932, § 10065; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-207.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 877.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.